District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-303.04

Duties of initiating tribunal.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 304, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(d), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(4), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-343.4.
D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (a), deleted “3 copies of” preceding “the petition”; and rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) If a responding state has not enacted the provisions of this chapter, or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter, a tribunal of the District may issue a certificate or other document and make findings required by the law of the responding state. If the responding state is a foreign jurisdiction, the tribunal may specify the amount of support sought and provide other documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of the responding state.”

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 304 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).